zh-CN: 拖曳系统材质: 碳纤维; 陶瓷; 软木; 十字碳纤维; Dartainium 材质; 混合材料; 不锈钢; 其他
pl: Materiał systemu hamulca: Włókno węglowe; Ceramika; Korek; Krzyżowe włókno węglowe; Dartainium; Hybryda; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
tr: Kalama sistemi malzemesi: Karbon fiber; Seramik; Mantar; Çapraz karbon; Dartainium; Hibrit; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
sl-SI: Material vlečnega sistema: Ogljikova vlakna; Keramika; Pluta; Križno tkani karbon; Dartainium; Hibrid; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
lt-LT: Stabdžių sistemos medžiaga: Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Kamštinė medžiaga; Kryžminio pynimo anglies pluoštas; Dartainium; Hibridinis; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
de: Material des Bremssystems: Kohlefaser; Keramik; Kork; Kreuzcarbon; Dartainium; Hybrid; Edelstahl; Sonstige
ro-RO: Materialul sistemului de frânare: Fibră de carbon; Ceramică; Plută; Carbon încrucișat; Dartainium; Hibrid; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
el: Υλικό συστήματος φρένων: Ανθρακονήματα; Κεραμικό; Φελλός; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Υβριδικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
sk-SK: Materiál navíjacieho systému: Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Korok; Krížový karbón; Dartainium; Hybrid; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
fr: Matériau du système de frein: Fibre de carbone; Céramique; Liège; Carbone croisé; Dartainium; Hybride; Acier inoxydable; Autre
pt-BR: Material do sistema de arrasto: Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Carbono cruzado; Dartainium; Híbrido; Aço inoxidável; Outros
hu: Fékrendszer anyaga: Szénszál; Kerámia; Parafa; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Hibrid; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
ru: Материал фрикционной системы: Карбон; Керамика; Пробка; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Гибрид; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
th: วัสดุระบบลาก: คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; เซรามิก; ไม้ก๊อก; ครอสคาร์บอน; Dartainium; ไฮบริด; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
es: Material del sistema de arrastre: Fibra de carbono; Cerámica; Corcho; Carbono cruzado; Dartainium; Híbrido; Acero inoxidable; Otro
it: Materiale del sistema di trascinamento: Fibra di carbonio; Ceramica; Sughero; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Ibrido; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
vi: Vật liệu hệ thống hãm: Sợi carbon; Gốm; Lie; Carbon đan chéo; Dartainium; Hỗn hợp; Thép không gỉ; Khác
ko: 드래그 시스템 재질: 탄소 섬유; 세라믹; 코르크; 크로스 카본; Dartainium; 하이브리드; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
pt-PT: Material do sistema de arrasto: Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Híbrido; Aço inoxidável; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на системата за фрикционен спирачен механизъм: Въглеродни влакна; Керамика; Корк; Кръстосан карбон; Dartainium; Хибрид; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
cs: Materiál brzdového systému: Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Korek; Křížový karbon; Dartainium; Hybridní; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
hr-HR: Materijal sustava za vuču: Ugljična vlakna; Keramika; Pluto; Križna ugljična vlakna; Dartainium; Hibrid; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
nb: Materiale for dragsystem: Karbonfiber; Keramikk; Kork; Krysskarbon; Dartainium; Hybrid; Rustfritt stål; Annet
zh-TW: 捲線器煞車系統材質: 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 軟木; 交叉碳纖維; Dartainium; 混合; 不鏽鋼; 其他
nl: Slipremsysteem materiaal: Koolstofvezel; Keramiek; Kurk; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Hybride; Roestvrij staal; Overige
fi: Vetojärjestelmän materiaali: Hiilikuitu; Keraaminen; Korkki; Ristiinkudottu hiilikuitu; Dartainium; Hybridi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
en: Drag system material: Carbon fiber; Ceramic; Cork; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Hybrid; Stainless steel; Other
ja: ドラッグシステム素材: カーボンファイバー; セラミック; コルク; クロスカーボン; ダータニウム; ハイブリッド; ステンレススチール; その他
sv: Material för dragsystem: Kolfiber; Keramik; Kork; Cross carbon; Dartainium; Hybrid; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
da: Træksystemmateriale: Kulfiber; Keramisk; Kork; Kryds-carbon; Dartainium; Hybrid; Rustfrit stål; Andet